Maryland, session 2026, SB0882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
10–101.
(h) (1) “Institution of higher education” means an institution of postsecondary
education that generally limits enrollment to graduates of secondary schools, and awards
degrees at either the associate, baccalaureate, or graduate level.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0882*

SENATE BILL 882
(2) “Institution of higher education” includes public, private nonprofit, and
for–profit institutions of higher education.
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION
COMMISSION.
(3) “ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) IS EMPLOYED FULL–TIME IN A PUBLIC PRIMARY OR
SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE STATE;
(II) PARTICIPATES IN THE CAREER LADDER ESTABLISHED
UNDER TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 10 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; AND
(III) HAS OUTSTANDING STUDENT LOAN DEBT.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, AN ELIGIBLE
INDIVIDUAL MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR UNDER THIS
SECTION EXCEEDS THE TOTAL TAX OTHERWISE DUE, AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL MAY
APPLY THE EXCESS AS A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR SUCCEEDING
TAXABLE YEARS UNTIL THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS IS USED.
(C) (1) (I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, AN ELIGIBLE
INDIVIDUAL MAY APPLY TO THE COMMISSION FOR THE TAX CREDIT AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL SHALL CERTIFY TO THE
COMMISSION THAT THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL WILL APPLY THE VALUE OF ANY
CREDIT APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE REPAYMENT OF THE ELIGIBLE
INDIVIDUAL’S UNDERGRADUATE OR GRADUATE STUDENT LOAN DEBT OR BOTH AS
PRACTICABLE.
(2) THE APPLICATION SHALL STATE:

SENATE BILL 882 3
(I) THE HIGH SCHOOL AND INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION FROM WHICH THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL GRADUATED;
(II) THE DEGREE THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL RECEIVED;
(III) THE EMPLOYER FOR WHICH THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL
WORKS;
(IV) THE AMOUNT OF THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL’S STUDENT
LOAN DEBT; AND
(V) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE COMMISSION.
(3) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATIONS AND
AWARD THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS AS
INDICATED BY A TIME AND DATE STAMP OF THE SUBMISSION OF THE APPLICATION.
(II) 1. THE COMMISSION SHALL AWARD AT LEAST 70% OF
THE AMOUNT AVAILABLE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO
ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS WHO GRADUATED FROM A HIGH SCHOOL IN THE STATE AND,
IN THE PREVIOUS YEAR, GRADUATED FROM AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
IN THE STATE.
2. THE COMMISSION SHALL AWARD THE REMAINING
AMOUNT AVAILABLE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO ELIGIBLE
INDIVIDUALS REGARDLESS OF:
A. THE LOCATION OF THE HIGH SCHOOL OR
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION FROM WHICH THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL
GRADUATED; OR
B. THE YEAR IN WHICH THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL
GRADUATED FROM AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(III) AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT RECEIVE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE IF THE APPLICANT PREVIOUSLY RECEIVED A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(IV) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES THAT
MAY BE AWARDED ANNUALLY MAY NOT EXCEED THE GREATER OF $5,000,000.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL NOTIFY THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL OF THE AMOUNT OF A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE AWARDED TO THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL.

SENATE BILL 882
(2) (I) THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE SHALL STATE THE TOTAL
AMOUNT OF A TAX CREDIT AWARDED TO THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (III), (IV), AND (V) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL MAY CLAIM A CREDIT EQUAL TO ONE–FIFTH
OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT STATED ON THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR 5
CONSECUTIVE TAXABLE YEARS.
(III) FOR EACH OF THE 4 TAXABLE YEARS AFTER FIRST
CLAIMING THE TAX CREDIT AVAILABLE UNDER THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL
AWARDED A CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION
VERIFICATION THAT THE INDIVIDUAL CONTINUES TO BE EMPLOYED IN A PUBLIC
PRIMARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE STATE AND IS ON THE CAREER LADDER
ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 10 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(IV) IF AN INDIVIDUAL DOES NOT COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENT OF SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION
SHALL RESCIND THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
(V) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT CLAIM THE TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SECTION IN THE SAME TAXABLE YEAR AS A TAX CREDIT UNDER § 10–740 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(VI) 1. THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT CLAIMED UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL BE RECAPTURED IF THE INDIVIDUAL DOES NOT USE THE
CREDIT APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE REPAYMENT OF THE
INDIVIDUAL’S UNDERGRADUATE OR GRADUATE STUDENT LOAN DEBT OR BOTH
WITHIN 3 YEARS FROM THE CLOSE OF THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE CREDIT
IS CLAIMED.
2. THE INDIVIDUAL WHO CLAIMED THE CREDIT SHALL
PAY THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT CLAIMED AS TAXES PAYABLE TO THE STATE
FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE
CREDIT OCCURS.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS WHO APPLIED FOR THE
CREDIT;

SENATE BILL 882 5
(2) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES ISSUED;
(3) THE HIGH SCHOOL AND INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
FROM WHICH EACH ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL GRADUATED;
(4) THE EMPLOYER FOR WHICH EACH ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL WORKS;
(5) THE AVERAGE AMOUNT OF STUDENT LOAN DEBT OF THE ELIGIBLE
INDIVIDUALS;
(6) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES RESCINDED;
AND
(7) AN ANALYSIS OF THE IMPACT OF THE TAX CREDIT PROVIDED
UNDER THIS SECTION ON THE RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION OF TEACHERS IN THE
STATE.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.